Idaho, session 2025, H0225.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The Legislature finds
that:
(a) Student use of mobile devices in schools has had a multitude of
negative effects on student outcomes. Mobile devices can be a constant
distraction that disrupts the learning environment for all students.
(b) Mobile devices can increase harm to students' mental health by
recording students without consent or through increased cyberbullying.
Idaho students are still recovering from the massive effects of school
closures during the COVID-19 pandemic, including severe learning loss
and troubling trends in student mental health.
(c) Student mobile device use should be as limited as possible during
school hours to reduce mobile device-related distractions in classroom
settings.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage and assist school
districts and public charter schools in adopting bell-to-bell mobile device
restriction policies for K-12 students in Idaho. A bell-to-bell mobile de-
vice policy is a school policy that restricts access to a mobile device by
students in school from the beginning of the school day until the time stu-
dents are released from school at the end of the day, with certain exceptions
when devices may be required for educational purposes or for student health
and medical needs. This act creates the School Mobile Device Policy Fund
and a grant program to assist school districts and public charter schools
with the costs of purchasing equipment to store students' phones during the
school day and related services.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 9, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-919, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-919. SCHOOL MOBILE DEVICE POLICY FUND. (1) There is hereby estab-
lished in the state treasury the school mobile device policy fund to which
shall be credited all moneys that may be appropriated, apportioned, allo-
cated, and paid back to such fund. Moneys in the fund shall be distributed
as need-based grants to school districts and public charter schools for the
purpose of offsetting costs associated with implementing polices that limit
the access to and use of mobile devices by students during school hours as


provided in this section. Grants from such fund shall be distributed to
school districts as provided in this section. The fund shall be managed by
the office of the state board of education.
(2) For the purposes of this section:
(a) "Bell-to-bell mobile device policy" means a school policy that
restricts access to a mobile device by students in school from the be-
ginning of the school day until the time students are released from
school at the end of the day and may include exceptions when devices may
be required for educational purposes or for student health and medical
needs; and
(b) "Mobile device" means any personal portable wireless device not
provided by a school or school district that has the capability of pro-
viding email, text, audio, visual, or other data communication between
two (2) or more parties.
(3) To be eligible to apply for funds under this section, a school dis-
trict or public charter school shall:
(a) Adopt and implement a bell-to-bell mobile device policy; and
(b) Demonstrate sufficient financial need to require assistance in
purchasing the necessary equipment or services required to implement
the bell-to-bell mobile device policy.
(4) The grant application process shall be administered as follows:
(a) A school district or public charter school demonstrating financial
need may apply to the office of the state board of education to receive
grant funds from the school mobile device policy fund to finance the
purchase of equipment and services necessary to implement school poli-
cies to restrict the access to and use of mobile devices as provided in
subsection (3) of this section. An application for such grant shall be
submitted to the office of the state board of education and shall in-
clude the following information:
(i) The contact information of the applicant school district or
public charter school;
(ii) A copy of the proposed bell-to-bell mobile device policy;
(iii) A detailed plan that outlines the specific equipment or ser-
vices that the school district or public charter school intends to
purchase, which shall include a detailed explanation of how such
equipment or services are necessary to implement the policy;
(iv) The projected cost of the equipment or services; and
(v) Relevant details regarding the financial need of the appli-
cant school district or public charter school.
(b) The office of the state board of education shall review all appli-
cations for grant funds pursuant to this section to determine whether
to approve any such application and shall notify the state board of ed-
ucation whether a school district or public charter school's applica-
tion was granted. In determining which applicants shall have priority
to receive grant funds, the office of the state board of education shall
consider the applicant school district's or public charter school's fi-
nancial need in relation to the financial need of other applicants, the
cost of the equipment or services a school is proposing to purchase, and
the number of students who will benefit from a grant distribution.


(c) The office of the state board of education shall prescribe forms for
applying for the grant pursuant to this section.
(5) The office of the state board of education shall make reasonable ef-
forts to communicate and coordinate with school districts and public char-
ter schools in the state of Idaho to secure statewide contracts for the pur-
chase of equipment and services commonly used by schools around the state to
implement policies that limit the access to and use of mobile devices by stu-
dents during the school day when such contracts will result in equipment and
services being purchased at a lower cost. The office of the state board of
education may distribute such equipment or services directly to a grant ap-
plicant in lieu of distributing grant funds if such equipment or services are
of the type that the grant applicant is proposing to purchase with the grant
funds.
(6) The state board of education shall compile data from each recipi-
ent school district and public charter school related to suspensions, expul-
sions, ISAT scores, Idaho reading indicator scores, and high school grade
point average for three (3) years before the date of such school's applica-
tion for grant funds until three (3) years after it receives any benefit from
the grant program. No later than December 1 of each year, the state board
of education shall review the data from the previous school year for each
recipient school district and public charter school and shall prepare and
submit a report to the joint finance-appropriations committee, house edu-
cation committee, and senate education committee of the Idaho legislature,
which report shall summarize the data received and provide an assessment re-
garding the effectiveness of the mobile device policies in terms of the im-
pact such policies have had on student suspensions, expulsions, ISAT scores,
Idaho reading indicator scores, and high school grade point average for the
recipient schools.
(7) All payments from the school mobile device policy fund shall be paid
out directly to the school district or public charter school in warrants
drawn by the state controller upon presentation of proper vouchers from the
office of the state board of education. Idle moneys in the school mobile
device policy fund shall be invested by the state treasurer in the same man-
ner as provided pursuant to section 67-1210, Idaho Code. Interest earned on
moneys in the fund shall be returned to the school mobile device policy fund.
SECTION 3. The provisions of Section 2 of this act shall be null, void
and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2028.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.